Connecticut, session 2026, HB05304.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (NEW) (Effective January 1, 2027) The Insurance Department
shall hold a public hearing on any long-term care premium rate increase
request that exceeds ten per cent. The Insurance Department shall
provide notice of any such hearing electronically to the joint standing
committees of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
relating to insurance and aging not less than fourteen days in advance
of such hearing. Any insurance company, fraternal benefit society,
hospital service corporation, medical service corporation or health care
center that requests such premium rate increase shall provide each
policyholder with written notice of the date and time of such hearing
not less than fourteen days in advance of such date.
Sec. 2. (NEW) (Effective January 1, 2027) No insurance company,
fraternal benefit society, hospital service corporation, medical service
corporation or health care center may deliver, issue for delivery, renew,
continue or amend any long-term care policy in this state on or after
January 1, 2027, unless such insurance company, fraternal benefit
society, hospital service corporation, medical service corporation or
health care center provides written notice to an individual prior to the
purchase of any long-term care policy of the risk of future premium rate
LCO 1 of 2

Substitute Bill No. 5304
increases.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 January 1, 2027 New section
Sec. 2 January 1, 2027 New section
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
In Section 1, in the first sentence, "for long-term care premium rate
increase requests" was changed to "on any long-term care premium rate
increase request" for clarity.
AGE Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 2 of 2